North Carolina, session 2025, SB181.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Use Services, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring funds for each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for the purpose of supporting the addition of five new
mobile crisis teams with a focus on providing services to the areas of highest need.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S181-v-1*